Utah statutes.
53-3-209.   Provisional licenses only for persons under 21 -- Separate point system -- Denial and suspension procedures.

(1)  The division may only grant a provisional license to a person younger than 21 years of age.

(2) (a)  The division shall make rules for the establishment and administration of a separate point system for persons granted provisional licenses to facilitate counseling, penalization, or both earlier than for persons 21 years of age or older.

(b)  The rules shall establish point thresholds at which each of the following actions are taken:

(i)  a warning letter;

(ii)  a request to appear for a hearing;

(iii)  a denial of the driving privilege for first or second actions where the point total established under Section 53-3-221 does not exceed the point threshold under which a person 21 years or older may be suspended; and

(iv)  a suspension of the driving privilege.

(c)  The rules shall require:

(i)  an extension of the denial or suspension period for further violations within the three-year period; and

(ii)  denial or suspension of the driving privilege for failure to appear for a hearing required under this section.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

